Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ 3 ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the department for the blind for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,236,726 11 DIVISION II 12 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 13 Sec. 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 14 from the general fund of the state to the department of 15 education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 16 ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof 17 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 19 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,293,356 22 b. By January 15, 2026, the department shall submit 23 a written report to the general assembly detailing the 24 departmentâs antibullying programming and current and projected 25 expenditures for such programming for the fiscal year beginning 26 July 1, 2025. 27 2. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION 28 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 733,066 31 3. PUBLIC BROADCASTING DIVISION 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, capital expenditures, 33 and miscellaneous purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,214,440 35 -1- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 1/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 4. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION 1 For reimbursement for career and technical education 2 expenditures made by regional career and technical education 3 planning partnerships in accordance with section 256.136: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,952,459 5 5. SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE 6 For use as state matching moneys for federal programs that 7 shall be disbursed according to federal regulations, including 8 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,797 10 6. BIRTH TO AGE THREE SERVICES 11 a. For expansion of the federal Individuals with 12 Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, Pub. L. No. 13 108-446, as amended to January 1, 2018, birth through age three 14 services due to increased numbers of children qualifying for 15 those services: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,721,400 17 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, 18 $383,769 shall be allocated to the child health specialty 19 clinics administered by the state university of Iowa in order 20 to provide additional support for infants and toddlers who are 21 born prematurely, drug-exposed, or medically fragile. 22 7. EARLY HEAD START PROJECTS 23 a. For early head start projects: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 574,500 25 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 26 used for implementation and expansion of early head start 27 pilot projects addressing the comprehensive cognitive, social, 28 emotional, and developmental needs of children from birth to 29 age three, including prenatal support for qualified families. 30 The projects shall promote healthy prenatal outcomes and 31 healthy family functioning, and strengthen the development of 32 infants and toddlers in low-income families. Priority shall be 33 given to those organizations that have previously qualified for 34 and received state funding to administer an early head start 35 -2- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 2/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ project. 1 8. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT AND TEACHER QUALITY PROGRAM 2 For purposes of the student achievement and teacher quality 3 program established pursuant to chapter 284 : 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,002,350 5 9. STATEWIDE STUDENT ASSESSMENT 6 a. For distribution to the Iowa testing program by the 7 department of education on behalf of school districts and 8 accredited nonpublic schools to offset the costs associated 9 with a statewide student assessment administered in accordance 10 with section 256.7, subsection 21 , paragraph âbâ: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 12 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 13 than $300,000 shall be distributed to the Iowa testing programs 14 within the state university of Iowa college of education 15 to offset the costs of administering the statewide student 16 assessment at accredited nonpublic schools. 17 10. STATEWIDE CLEARINGHOUSE TO EXPAND WORK-BASED LEARNING 18 For support costs associated with the creation of a 19 statewide clearinghouse to expand work-based learning as a part 20 of the future ready Iowa initiative: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 22 11. POSTSECONDARY SUMMER CLASSES FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS 23 PROGRAM 24 For support costs associated with the creation of a program 25 to provide additional moneys for resident high school pupils 26 enrolled in grades 9 through 12 to attend a community college 27 for college-level classes or attend a class taught by a 28 community college-employed instructor during the summer and 29 outside of the regular school year through a contractual 30 agreement between a community college and a school district 31 under the future ready Iowa initiative: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 33 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 34 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 35 -3- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 3/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 1 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 2 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 3 fiscal year. 4 12. JOBS FOR AMERICAâS GRADUATES 5 For school districts to reinforce combined efforts and 6 regional initiatives that accelerate para-educator and teacher 7 credential attainment and to provide direct services to the 8 most at-risk middle school or high school students enrolled 9 in school districts through direct intervention by a jobs for 10 Americaâs graduates specialist: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,646,450 12 13. ATTENDANCE CENTER PERFORMANCE/GENERAL INTERNET SITE AND 13 DATA SYSTEM SUPPORT 14 For administration of a process for school districts to 15 establish specific performance goals and to evaluate the 16 performance of each attendance center operated by the district 17 in order to arrive at an overall school performance grade and 18 report card for each attendance center, for internet site and 19 data system support: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 254,727 21 14. SUCCESSFUL PROGRESSION FOR EARLY READERS 22 For distribution to school districts for implementation 23 of section 279.68, subsection 2 , relating to successful 24 progression for early readers: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,824,782 26 15. EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR LITERACY 27 a. For purposes of purchasing a statewide license for an 28 early warning assessment and administering the early warning 29 system for literacy established in accordance with section 30 279.68 and rules adopted in accordance with section 256.7, 31 subsection 31 : 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,915,000 33 b. The department shall administer and distribute to school 34 districts and accredited nonpublic schools the early warning 35 -4- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 4/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ assessment system that allows teachers to screen and monitor 1 student literacy skills from prekindergarten through grade 2 six. The department may charge school districts and accredited 3 nonpublic schools a fee for the system not to exceed the actual 4 costs to purchase a statewide license for the early warning 5 assessment minus the moneys received by the department under 6 this subsection. The fee shall be determined by dividing the 7 actual remaining costs to purchase the statewide license for 8 the school year by the number of pupils assessed under the 9 system in the current fiscal year. School districts may use 10 moneys received pursuant to section 257.10, subsection 11 , and 11 moneys received for purposes of implementing section 279.68, 12 subsection 2 , to pay the early warning assessment system fee. 13 16. IOWA READING RESEARCH CENTER 14 a. For purposes of the Iowa reading research center in 15 order to implement, in collaboration with the area education 16 agencies, the provisions of section 256.9, subsection 49 , 17 paragraph âcâ: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 19 b. From moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 20 than $250,000 shall be used for collaborations with the state 21 board of education relating to the approval of practitioner 22 preparation programs pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 , 23 paragraph âcâ, and with the board of educational examiners for 24 the establishment and continuing oversight of the advanced 25 dyslexia specialist endorsement pursuant to section 256.146, 26 subsection 21. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 27 ending June 30, 2026, the center shall submit a report to the 28 general assembly detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 29 purposes of this paragraph âbâ. 30 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 31 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 32 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 33 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 34 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 35 -5- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 5/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ fiscal year. 1 17. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE 2 FUND 3 For deposit in the computer science professional development 4 incentive fund established under section 284.6A : 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 6 18. CHILDRENâS MENTAL HEALTH SCHOOL-BASED TRAINING AND 7 SUPPORT 8 a. For distribution to area education agencies for 9 school-based childrenâs mental health services, including 10 mental health awareness training for educators: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,383,936 12 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection for 13 distribution to area education agencies, $200,000 shall be 14 used for purposes of implementing a childrenâs grief and loss 15 rural pilot program to serve Iowa children in rural school 16 districts or accredited nonpublic schools. The pilot program 17 shall be administered by, and the moneys allocated pursuant to 18 this paragraph shall be distributed to, an existing statewide 19 not-for-profit health care organization that currently provides 20 grief and loss services to children. For the fiscal year 21 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the health 22 care organization receiving moneys pursuant to this paragraph 23 shall prepare a report, in collaboration with the department 24 of education, detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 25 the purposes of this program and its outcomes, which shall be 26 submitted to the general assembly by September 30, 2026. 27 19. BEST BUDDIES IOWA 28 a. For school districts to create opportunities for 29 one-to-one friendships, integrated employment, and leadership 30 development for students with intellectual and developmental 31 disabilities: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,000 33 b. The department of education shall establish criteria for 34 the distribution of moneys appropriated under this subsection 35 -6- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 6/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ and shall require an organization receiving moneys under this 1 subsection to annually report student identifying data for 2 students participating in the program to the department in the 3 manner prescribed by the department as a condition of receiving 4 such moneys. 5 20. MIDWESTERN HIGHER EDUCATION COMPACT 6 a. For distribution to the midwestern higher education 7 compact to pay Iowaâs member state annual obligation: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,000 9 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 10 pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or 11 unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 12 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 13 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 14 21. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS TO 15 COMMUNITY COLLEGES 16 For payments to community colleges for the concurrent 17 enrollment of accredited nonpublic school students under 18 section 261E.8, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 20 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 21 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 22 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 23 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 24 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 25 22. COMMUNITY COLLEGES 26 For general state financial aid to merged areas, as defined 27 in section 260C.2 , in accordance with section 260C.18C: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,575,324 29 23. IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF 30 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,197,979 33 24. IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY 34 IMPAIRED PROGRAM 35 -7- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 7/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,096,053 3 25. SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS 4 (STEM) COLLABORATIVE INITIATIVE 5 For purposes of the science, technology, engineering, 6 and mathematics (STEM) collaborative initiative established 7 pursuant to section 256.111: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,365,030 9 a. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 10 expended for salaries, staffing, institutional support, 11 activities directly related to recruitment of kindergarten 12 through grade 12 mathematics and science teachers, and for 13 ongoing mathematics and science programming for students 14 enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12. 15 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , of the moneys appropriated 16 in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 17 the close of the fiscal year, an amount equivalent to not more 18 than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection 19 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 20 summer programs for students until the close of the succeeding 21 fiscal year. 22 26. THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE FUND 23 For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund 24 established pursuant to section 256.25 : 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,351,382 26 27. ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM 27 For purposes of administering an online state job posting 28 system that allows the department of education, school 29 districts, charter schools, area education agencies, and 30 accredited nonpublic schools to post job openings on an 31 internet site: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 265,000 33 28. LEAD-K PROGRAM 34 For purposes of developing guidelines for a comprehensive 35 -8- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 8/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ family support mentoring program that meets the language and 1 communication needs of families pursuant to section 256.106: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 3 29. DIVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION 4 For general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee 5 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes 6 within the area education agency regions and the department of 7 education main office: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 9 30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT 10 For purposes of providing required professional development 11 to public and nonpublic schools: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,458 13 31. COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION 14 a. Administration 15 For general administration salaries, support, maintenance, 16 and miscellaneous purposes, and for the administration of the 17 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 18 program in accordance with section 256.228, including salaries, 19 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes related to the 20 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 21 program: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 602,199 23 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, not more than 24 $600,000 in total interest or earnings on moneys appropriated 25 from the general fund of the state to the department of 26 education for purposes of a scholarship or grant program 27 described in chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4, for the 28 fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure by the 29 college student aid commission for purposes of administering 30 any scholarship or grant program described in chapter 256, 31 subchapter VII, part 4. 32 b. National guard service scholarship program 33 For purposes of providing national guard service 34 scholarships under the program established in section 256.210: 35 -9- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 9/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,600,000 1 c. All Iowa opportunity scholarship program 2 (1) For purposes of the all Iowa opportunity scholarship 3 program established pursuant to section 256.212: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,229,468 5 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, if the 6 moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph exceed $500,000, 7 âeligible institutionâ as defined in section 256.212 shall, 8 during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, include 9 accredited private institutions as defined in section 256.183. 10 d. Teach Iowa scholar program 11 For purposes of the teach Iowa scholar program established 12 pursuant to section 256.218: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 14 e. Rural veterinarian loan repayment program 15 For purposes of the rural veterinarian loan repayment 16 program established pursuant to section 256.226: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 18 f. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar 19 scholarship program 20 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce 21 last-dollar scholarship fund established pursuant to section 22 256.228: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,927,005 24 g. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program 25 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant 26 fund established pursuant to section 256.229: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 28 h. Iowa workforce grant and incentive program 29 For deposit in the Iowa workforce grant and incentive 30 program fund created in section 256.230: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,500,000 32 i. Health care professional incentive program 33 For deposit in the health care professional incentive 34 program fund created in section 256.222, if enacted in 2025 35 -10- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 10/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Iowa Acts, Senate Study Bill 1163, 2025 Iowa Acts, House Study 1 Bill 191, or any successor legislation: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 3 Sec. 3. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND 4 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled 5 worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the 6 department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 7 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 8 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 9 designated: 10 1. For purposes of providing skilled workforce shortage 11 tuition grants in accordance with section 256.227: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 13 2. For deposit in the workforce training and economic 14 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,100,000 16 From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not 17 more than $100,000 shall be used by the department for 18 administration of the workforce training and economic 19 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A . 20 3. For capital projects at community colleges that meet the 21 definition of the term âvertical infrastructureâ in section 22 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 24 Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be disbursed 25 pursuant to section 260G.6, subsection 3 . Projects that 26 qualify for moneys appropriated in this subsection must include 27 at least one of the following: 28 a. Accelerated career education program capital projects. 29 b. Major renovations and major repair needs, including 30 health, life, and fire safety needs, including compliance with 31 the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. 32 4. For deposit in the pathways for academic career and 33 employment fund established pursuant to section 260H.2 : 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,800,000 35 -11- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 11/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 5. For deposit in the gap tuition assistance fund 1 established pursuant to section 260I.2 : 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 3 6. For support costs associated with administering a 4 workforce preparation outcome reporting system for the purpose 5 of collecting and reporting data relating to the educational 6 and employment outcomes of workforce preparation programs 7 receiving moneys pursuant to this section: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 9 7. For STEM best: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 11 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 12 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 13 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 14 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 15 succeeding fiscal year. 16 Sec. 4. CHIROPRACTIC LOAN FUNDS. Notwithstanding section 17 256.204, the moneys deposited in the chiropractic loan 18 revolving fund created pursuant to section 256.204 for the 19 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 20 may be used for purposes of the chiropractic loan forgiveness 21 program established in section 256.205. 22 Sec. 5. PRESCRIPTION DRUG COSTS. The department of 23 administrative services shall pay the Iowa school for the deaf 24 and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually 25 impaired program the moneys collected from the counties during 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for expenses relating 27 to prescription drug costs for students attending the Iowa 28 school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the 29 blind and visually impaired program. 30 DIVISION III 31 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 32 Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 33 from the general fund of the state to the state board of 34 regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 35 -12- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 12/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 1 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 2 1. OFFICE OF STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 3 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 764,642 6 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 7 30, 2026, the state board of regents shall submit a quarterly 8 financial report to the general assembly in a format agreed 9 upon by the state board of regents office and the legislative 10 services agency. The report submitted for the quarter ending 11 December 31, 2025, shall include the five-year graduation rates 12 for the regents universities. 13 b. For distribution to the western Iowa regents resource 14 center: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 268,297 16 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 17 June 30, 2026, the state board of regents and the institutions 18 of higher learning governed by the state board of regents 19 shall not reduce moneys budgeted for the fiscal year for the 20 institutionsâ police departments. 21 d. For allocation in equal parts by the state board of 22 regents to the state university of Iowa, the Iowa state 23 university of science and technology, and the university 24 of northern Iowa to support the John Pappajohn centers for 25 entrepreneurship: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 27 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be 28 used to supplement, not supplant, any other funding received by 29 the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship. 30 2. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 31 a. General university 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 33 aid, and miscellaneous purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,966,282 35 -13- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 13/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ b. Oakdale campus 1 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,103,819 4 c. State hygienic laboratory 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,822,610 8 d. Family practice program 9 For allocation by the dean of the college of medicine, with 10 approval of the advisory board, to qualified participants 11 to carry out the provisions of chapter 148D for the family 12 practice residency education program, including salaries and 13 support: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,220,598 15 e. Child health care services 16 For specialized child health care services, including 17 childhood cancer diagnostic and treatment network programs, 18 rural comprehensive care for hemophilia patients, and the Iowa 19 high-risk infant follow-up program, including salaries and 20 support: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 634,502 22 f. Statewide cancer registry 23 For the statewide cancer registry: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,410 25 g. Substance abuse consortium 26 For distribution to the Iowa consortium for substance abuse 27 research and evaluation: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,427 29 h. Center for biocatalysis 30 For the center for biocatalysis: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 696,342 32 i. Primary health care initiative 33 For the primary health care initiative in the college of 34 medicine: 35 -14- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 14/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 624,374 1 From the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 2 $254,889 shall be allocated to the department of family 3 practice at the state university of Iowa college of medicine 4 for family practice faculty and support staff. 5 j. Birth defects registry 6 For the birth defects registry: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,839 8 k. Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center 9 For the Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 156,389 11 l. Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 12 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative 13 For the Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 14 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative established 15 pursuant to section 263.8A : 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 463,616 17 m. Iowa flood center 18 For the Iowa flood center for use by the universityâs college 19 of engineering pursuant to section 466C.1 : 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,205,593 21 n. College of nursing 22 For employing additional instructors in the college of 23 nursing to increase the number of students who graduate from 24 the college of nursing: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 26 o. Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan 27 For purposes of developing an Iowa cancer assessment and 28 intervention plan, under the direction of and on behalf of 29 the department of health and human services, pursuant to 30 an agreement between the state university of Iowa and the 31 department of health and human services: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 33 The Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan must 34 include a thorough analysis of the potential causes of Iowaâs 35 -15- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 15/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ high incidence of cancer in order to guide the department of 1 health and human services in developing targeted policies, 2 enhancing prevention and screening programs, raising public 3 awareness, and integrating evidence-based findings into 4 existing initiatives. The state university of Iowaâs 5 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 6 is contingent upon the state university of Iowa complying with 7 the terms, conditions, and prescribed deliverables in the 8 agreement between the university and the department of health 9 and human services. 10 3. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 11 a. General university 12 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 13 aid, and miscellaneous purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,013,938 15 b. Agricultural experiment station 16 For the agricultural experiment station salaries, support, 17 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,462,535 19 c. Cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 20 economics 21 For the cooperative extension service in agriculture 22 and home economics salaries, support, maintenance, and 23 miscellaneous purposes: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 18,157,366 25 d. Preparing Iowaâs future ready workforce and fostering 26 innovation 27 For purposes of addressing the stateâs workforce needs in 28 the areas of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 29 by expanding degree and certificate programs in the areas of 30 artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, computer science, 31 computer engineering, data science, software engineering, and 32 other high-demand areas related to technology, and fostering 33 innovation in the areas of digital agriculture, manufacturing, 34 water quality, vaccine delivery technologies, and biosciences: 35 -16- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 16/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 1 e. Veterinary early acceptance 2 For purposes of the veterinary early acceptance program: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 4 4. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA 5 a. General university 6 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 7 aid, and miscellaneous purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,932,029 9 b. Real estate education program 10 For purposes of the real estate education program: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 123,523 12 c. Educators for Iowa 13 For purposes of recruiting additional students to 14 participate in educational opportunities that lead to teacher 15 licensure: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 17 Sec. 7. ENERGY COST-SAVINGS PROJECTS ââ FINANCING. For 18 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 19 2026, the state board of regents may use notes, bonds, or 20 other evidences of indebtedness issued under section 262.48 to 21 finance projects that will result in energy cost savings in an 22 amount that will cause the state board to recover the cost of 23 the projects within an average of six years. 24 DIVISION IV 25 STANDING APPROPRIATIONS 26 Sec. 8. AT-RISK CHILDREN. Notwithstanding the standing 27 appropriation in section 279.51 for the fiscal year beginning 28 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated 29 from the general fund of the state to the department of 30 education for programs for at-risk children under section 31 279.51 shall not be more than $10,524,389. The amount of any 32 reduction in this section shall be prorated among the programs 33 specified in section 279.51, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, 34 and âcâ. 35 -17- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 17/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 9. WORK-STUDY APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding section 1 256.209, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 2 ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the general 3 fund of the state to the college student aid commission of 4 the department of education for the work-study program under 5 section 256.209 shall be zero. 6 Sec. 10. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL PUPIL TRANSPORTATION. 7 Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the following 8 designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 9 and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the 10 general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 11 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 12 amount: 13 For payment of claims for nonpublic school pupil 14 transportation under section 285.2: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,997,091 16 If total approved claims for reimbursement for nonpublic 17 school pupil transportation exceed the amount appropriated in 18 accordance with this section, the department of education shall 19 prorate the amount of each approved claim. 20 Sec. 11. INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT STATE AID ââ FY 21 2025-2026. In lieu of the appropriation provided in section 22 257.20, subsection 2, the appropriation for the fiscal year 23 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for paying 24 instructional support state aid under section 257.20 for the 25 fiscal year is zero. 26 DIVISION V 27 IOWA TUITION GRANTS 28 Sec. 12. Section 256.177, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 29 amended by striking the subsection. 30 Sec. 13. Section 256.189, Code 2025, is amended by adding 31 the following new subsection: 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. An Iowa tuition grants fund is 33 established in the state treasury. The fund shall be 34 administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys 35 -18- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 18/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received 1 by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in 2 the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 3 providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled 4 in accredited private institutions. Notwithstanding section 5 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year 6 shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall 7 remain available for expenditure for purposes of providing 8 tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in 9 accredited private institutions for subsequent fiscal years. 10 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 11 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the 12 fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 13 administering any scholarship or grant program described in 14 this subchapter VII, part 4. 15 Sec. 14. Section 256.191, Code 2025, is amended by adding 16 the following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Fund established. An Iowa tuition 18 grants for-profit institutions fund is established in the state 19 treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission 20 and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general 21 assembly and other moneys received by the commission for 22 deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated 23 to the commission for purposes of providing tuition grants to 24 qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions. 25 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close 26 of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of 27 the state but shall remain available for expenditure for 28 purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who 29 are enrolled in eligible institutions for subsequent fiscal 30 years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 31 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the 32 fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 33 administering any scholarship or grant program described in 34 this subchapter VII, part 4. 35 -19- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 19/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 15. Section 256.192, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. A vocational-technical tuition grants 3 fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be 4 administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys 5 appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received 6 by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in 7 the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 8 providing vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to 9 this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the 10 fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to 11 the general fund of the state but shall remain available for 12 expenditure for purposes of providing vocational-technical 13 tuition grants pursuant to this section for subsequent fiscal 14 years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 15 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the 16 fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 17 administering any scholarship or grant program described in 18 this subchapter VII, part 4. 19 Sec. 16. Section 256.194, subsections 1, 2, and 3, Code 20 2025, are amended to read as follows: 21 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 22 to the commission for For each fiscal year beginning on or 23 after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the general 24 fund of the state to the commission for deposit in the Iowa 25 tuition grants fund established in section 256.189, subsection 26 3, the sum of fifty-two million seven hundred seven thousand 27 sixty-nine dollars for tuition grants to qualified students who 28 are enrolled in accredited private institutions fifty-three 29 million seven hundred sixty-one thousand two hundred ten 30 dollars . 31 2. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 32 to the commission for For each fiscal year beginning on or 33 after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the general fund 34 of the state to the commission for deposit in the Iowa tuition 35 -20- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 20/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ grants for-profit institutions fund established in section 1 256.191, subsection 8, the sum of one hundred ten thousand 2 seven hundred dollars for tuition grants for qualified students 3 who are enrolled in eligible institutions one hundred twelve 4 thousand nine hundred fourteen dollars . 5 3. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 6 state to the commission for For each fiscal year beginning 7 on or after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the 8 general fund of the state to the commission for deposit in 9 the vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in 10 section 256.192, subsection 8, the sum of one million seven 11 hundred fifty thousand one hundred eighty-five dollars for 12 vocational-technical tuition grants . 13 Sec. 17. SCHOLARSHIP AND TUITION GRANT RESERVE FUND ââ 14 TRANSFER TO GENERAL FUND. Any moneys appropriated to the 15 department of education for purposes of the scholarship and 16 tuition grant reserve fund established pursuant to section 17 256.193 that remain unencumbered or unobligated as of July 1, 18 2025, shall be transferred to the general fund of the state. 19 Sec. 18. TRANSFER OF UNENCUMBERED OR UNOBLIGATED MONEYS 20 TO IOWA TUITION GRANTS FUND, IOWA TUITION GRANTS FOR-PROFIT 21 INSTITUTIONS FUND, AND VOCATIONAL-TECHNICAL TUITION GRANTS 22 FUND. 23 1. Any moneys appropriated to the department of education 24 prior to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for purposes 25 of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are 26 enrolled in accredited private institutions pursuant to section 27 256.194, subsection 1, that remain unencumbered or unobligated 28 as of July 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the Iowa tuition 29 grants fund established in section 256.189, subsection 3, as 30 enacted in this division of this Act. 31 2. Any moneys appropriated to the department of education 32 prior to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for purposes 33 of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are 34 enrolled in eligible institutions pursuant to section 256.194, 35 -21- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 21/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ subsection 2, that remain unencumbered or unobligated as of 1 July 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the Iowa tuition grants 2 for-profit institutions fund established in section 256.191, 3 subsection 8, as enacted in this division of this Act. 4 3. Any moneys appropriated to the department of education 5 prior to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for 6 purposes of vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to 7 section 256.194, subsection 3, that remain unencumbered or 8 unobligated as of July 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the 9 vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in section 10 256.192, subsection 8, as enacted in this division of this Act. 11 Sec. 19. REPEAL. Section 256.193, Code 2025, is repealed. 12 DIVISION VI 13 STATE PROGRAM ALLOCATION 14 Sec. 20. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, c, 15 e, f, and g, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 16 a. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , 17 and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department, the amount of 18 five hundred eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the 19 issuance of national board certification awards in accordance 20 with section 256.44 . 21 (2) Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, not less 22 than eighty-five thousand dollars shall be used to administer 23 the ambassador to education position in accordance with section 24 256.45 . 25 (3) Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, moneys in 26 excess of the amount necessary for the purposes set forth in 27 subparagraphs (1) and (2) are appropriated to the department 28 for purposes of providing stipends to individuals who receive 29 an advanced dyslexia specialist endorsement from the board of 30 educational examiners. The department shall establish the 31 amount of the stipend based on the availability of moneys for 32 such purpose. 33 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 34 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , up to seven hundred twenty-eight 35 -22- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 22/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ thousand two hundred sixteen dollars to the department for 1 purposes of implementing the professional development program 2 requirements of section 284.6 , assistance in developing model 3 evidence for teacher quality committees established pursuant to 4 section 284.4, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , and the evaluator 5 training program in section 284.10 . A portion of the funds 6 allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may 7 be used by the department for administrative purposes and for 8 not more than four full-time equivalent positions. 9 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , 10 and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , an amount up to one million 11 seventy-seven thousand eight hundred ten dollars to the 12 department for the establishment of teacher development 13 academies in accordance with section 284.6, subsection 10 . A 14 portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes 15 of this paragraph may be used for administrative purposes. 16 e. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 17 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up to 18 fifty thousand dollars for purposes of the fine arts beginning 19 teacher mentoring program established under section 256.34 . 20 f. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 21 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up 22 to six hundred twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety-one 23 dollars shall be used by the department for a delivery system, 24 in collaboration with area education agencies, to assist in 25 implementing the career paths and leadership roles considered 26 pursuant to sections 284.15 , 284.16 , and 284.17 , including but 27 not limited to planning grants to school districts and area 28 education agencies, technical assistance for the department, 29 technical assistance for districts and area education agencies, 30 training and staff development, and the contracting of external 31 expertise and services. In using moneys allocated for purposes 32 of this paragraph, the department shall give priority to school 33 districts with certified enrollments of fewer than six hundred 34 students. A portion of the moneys allocated annually to the 35 -23- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 23/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ department for purposes of this paragraph may be used by the 1 department for administrative purposes and for not more than 2 five full-time equivalent positions. 3 g. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and 4 for each subsequent fiscal year, to the department, ten 5 million dollars for purposes of implementing the supplemental 6 assistance for high-need schools provisions of section 284.11 . 7 Annually, of the moneys allocated to the department for 8 purposes of this paragraph, up to one hundred thousand dollars 9 may be used by the department for administrative purposes and 10 for not more than one full-time equivalent position. 11 DIVISION VII 12 COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM 13 Sec. 21. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ COURT REPORTER 14 EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the 15 general fund of the state to the department of education for 16 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 17 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 18 to be used for the purposes designated: 19 For deposit in the court reporter equipment grant program 20 fund created in section 256.231, as enacted by this Act: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 22 Sec. 22. NEW SECTION . 256.231 Court reporter equipment 23 grant program. 24 1. A court reporter equipment grant program is established 25 to be administered by the college student aid commission. A 26 person is eligible to apply for a grant award under the program 27 if the person is enrolled in a court reporter training program 28 in this state. 29 2. Each applicant for the court reporter equipment grant 30 program shall, in accordance with the rules of the commission, 31 complete and file an application for a grant award. The 32 individual shall be responsible for the prompt submission of 33 any information required by the commission. 34 3. A recipient of a grant under the court reporter equipment 35 -24- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 24/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ grant program must use the moneys awarded by the college 1 student aid commission for the purchase of court reporter 2 equipment and software for the court reporter training program 3 in which the recipient is participating. 4 4. The college student aid commission shall do all of the 5 following: 6 a. Establish the evaluation criteria to be used in 7 evaluating applications submitted under this section. The 8 college student aid commission shall give priority to 9 applicants who are doing court-related work. 10 b. Establish grant application materials, eligibility 11 requirements, award criteria, and award amounts. 12 5. A court reporter equipment grant program fund is created 13 in the state treasury under the control of the college student 14 aid commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund 15 are appropriated to the college student aid commission to 16 be used for grants awarded as provided under this section. 17 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain 18 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 19 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 20 purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 21 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 22 to the fund. 23 6. The college student aid commission shall adopt rules 24 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 25 Sec. 23. REPEAL. Sections 15.485 and 15.486, Code 2025, 26 are repealed. 27 Sec. 24. COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT INCENTIVE FUND 28 ââ TRANSFER TO COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM 29 FUND. Unencumbered and unobligated moneys remaining in the 30 court reporter equipment incentive fund established pursuant 31 to section 15.486, Code 2025, on the effective date of this 32 division of this Act, are transferred to the court reporter 33 equipment grant program fund created in section 256.231, as 34 enacted by this Act. 35 -25- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 25/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 25. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 1 designate section 256.231, as enacted by this Act, as a new 2 subpart within chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4, entitled 3 âcourt reporter equipment grant programâ. 4 DIVISION VIII 5 COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION PROGRAMS 6 Sec. 26. Section 256.212, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 6. Fund established. An all Iowa opportunity scholarship 9 fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under 10 the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid 11 into the fund are appropriated and made available to the 12 commission to be used for scholarships for students meeting 13 the requirements of this section . Notwithstanding section 14 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year 15 shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall 16 be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal 17 years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 18 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund 19 and are appropriated to the college student aid commission 20 for purposes of administering any program described in this 21 subchapter VII, part 4. 22 Sec. 27. Section 256.218, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 23 amended to read as follows: 24 6. A teach Iowa scholar fund is established in the state 25 treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and 26 shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly 27 and any other moneys received by the commission for deposit 28 in the fund, including payments collected by the commission 29 pursuant to section 256.219, subsection 7 . The moneys in the 30 fund are appropriated to the commission for the teach Iowa 31 scholar program. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in 32 the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to 33 the general fund of the state but shall remain available for 34 expenditure for the teach Iowa scholar program for subsequent 35 -26- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 26/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , 1 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 2 to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid 3 commission for purposes of administering any program described 4 in this subchapter VII, part 4 . 5 Sec. 28. Section 256.226, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 10. Trust fund established. A rural veterinary care trust 8 fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under 9 the control of the commission. The commission may accept 10 gifts, grants, bequests, and other private contributions, as 11 well as state or federal moneys, for deposit in the fund. The 12 commission shall remit all repayments made pursuant to this 13 section to the rural veterinary care trust fund. All moneys 14 deposited or paid into the trust fund are appropriated and 15 made available to the commission to be used for meeting the 16 requirements of this section and increasing the number of 17 veterinarians participating in the program. Moneys in the 18 fund up to the total amount that an eligible individual may 19 receive for an eligible loan in accordance with this section 20 and upon fulfilling the requirements of subsection 4 , shall be 21 considered encumbered for the duration of the agreement entered 22 into pursuant to subsection 4 . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 23 any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not 24 revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available 25 for purposes of this section and to increase the number of 26 veterinarians participating in the program in subsequent fiscal 27 years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 28 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund 29 and are appropriated to the college student aid commission 30 for purposes of administering any program described in this 31 subchapter VII, part 4. 32 Sec. 29. Section 256.228, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce 35 -27- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 27/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ last-dollar scholarship fund is created in the state treasury 1 as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All 2 moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and 3 made available to the commission to be used for scholarships 4 awarded as provided under this section . Notwithstanding 5 section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal 6 year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but 7 shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent 8 fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, 9 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 10 to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid 11 commission for purposes of administering any program described 12 in this subchapter VII, part 4. 13 Sec. 30. Section 256.229, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce 16 grant fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund 17 under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or 18 paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the 19 commission to be used for grants awarded as provided under this 20 section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund 21 on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general 22 fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this 23 section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 24 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the 25 fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the 26 college student aid commission for purposes of administering 27 any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. 28 Sec. 31. Section 256.230, subsection 8, Code 2025, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 8. Fund created. An Iowa workforce grant and incentive 31 program fund is created in the state treasury under the control 32 of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the 33 fund are appropriated to the commission to be used for grants 34 and incentive payments awarded as provided in this section . 35 -28- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 28/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund that remain 1 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 2 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 3 purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 4 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 5 to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid 6 commission for purposes of administering any program described 7 in this subchapter VII, part 4 . 8 DIVISION IX 9 AREA EDUCATION AGENCIES 10 Sec. 32. REDUCTION ââ SPECIAL EDUCATION SUPPORT SERVICES 11 DISTRICT COST. Notwithstanding section 257.10, subsection 12 7, the state aid for school districts for special education 13 support services and the portion of the combined district cost 14 calculated for school districts for the fiscal year beginning 15 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, shall be reduced by 16 the department of management by $32,500,000. The reduction 17 for each area education agency shall be prorated based on the 18 weighted enrollment for special education support services for 19 the budget year. 20 Sec. 33. Section 257.35, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 2. Notwithstanding the deduction and payment under 23 subsection 1 , the amounts specified for school districts and 24 area education agencies in subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , for the 25 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and each succeeding fiscal 26 year ending June 30, 2025 , shall be reduced by the department 27 of management by seven million five hundred thousand dollars. 28 The department of management shall calculate a reduction such 29 that such amounts shall be reduced proportionally to the amount 30 that the district or agency would otherwise have received 31 under this section if the reduction imposed pursuant to this 32 subsection did not apply. 33 Sec. 34. Section 257.35, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 34 following new subsection: 35 -29- LSB 1012XG (13) 91 jda/jh 29/ 34 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ NEW SUBSECTION . 19A. The director of the department of 1 management may deduct the following from the state aid due to 2 each school district pursuant to this chapter and shall pay the 3 amounts to the respective area education agencies on a monthly 4 basis from September 15 through June 15 during each school year 5 for purposes of providing services to students enrolled in 6 nonpublic schools within the boundaries of the area education 7 agency: 8 a. The amount calculated for media services for the school 9 district that is attributable to the number of students 10 enrolled in nonpublic schools within the school district who 11 are provided with media services by an area education agency. 12 b. The amount calculated for educational services for the 13 school district that is attributable to the number of students 14 enrolled in nonpublic schools within the school district who 15 are provided with educational services by an area education 16 agency. 17